Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2411
Dual agent, defined.

Dual agent shall mean a limited agent who, with the written informed consent of all parties to a contemplated real estate transaction, has entered into a brokerage relationship with and therefor represents both the seller and buyer or both the landlord and tenant.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 11.